Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB103.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 335B.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 335B.020 to 335B.070, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Conviction of a crime" is limited to convictions of felonies or misdemeanors;
(2) "Hiring or licensing authority" means the official, board, commission, or
department of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, its agencies, or political
subdivisions, responsible by law for the hiring of persons for public employment
or the licensing of persons for occupations;
(3) ["Occupation" includes all occupations, trades, vocations, professions, businesses,
or employment of any kind for which a license is required to be issued by the
Commonwealth of Kentucky, its agencies, or political subdivisions.
(2) ]"License" includes all licenses, permits, certificates, registrations, or other means
required to engage in an occupation which are granted or issued by the
Commonwealth of Kentucky, its agents or political subdivisions before a person
can pursue, practice, or engage in any occupation;[. ]
(4) "Occupation" includes all occupations, trades, vocations, professions,
businesses, or employment of any kind for which a license is required to be issued
by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, its agencies, or political subdivisions;
(5) "Pose a reasonable threat" means the nature of the criminal conduct for which
the person was convicted involved an act or threat of harm against another and
has a bearing on the person's fitness or ability to serve the public or work with
others in the occupation; and
(6)[(3)] "Public employment" includes all employment with the Commonwealth of
Kentucky, its agencies, or political subdivisions[.
(4) "Conviction of a crime" shall be limited to convictions of felonies or
misdemeanors.
Page 1 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 921
(5) "Hiring or licensing authority" shall mean the person, board, commission, or
department of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, its agencies or political
subdivisions, responsible by law for the hiring of persons for public employment or
the licensing of persons for occupations].
Section 2. KRS 335B.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No person shall be disqualified from public employment, nor shall a person be
disqualified from pursuing, practicing, or engaging in any occupation for which a
license is required, solely because of a:
(a) Prior conviction of a crime, unless the crime for which convicted directly
relates to the position of employment sought or the occupation for which the
license is sought and poses a reasonable threat to public safety, health, or
welfare; or
(b) Finding that an applicant lacks good character or fails to meet any other
similar standard where a criminal conviction is the basis for the finding.
(2) In determining if a conviction directly relates to the position of public employment
sought or the occupation for which the license is sought, the hiring or licensing
authority shall consider:
(a) The nature and seriousness of the crime for which the person[individual] was
convicted and the passage of time since its commission;
(b) The age of the person at the time the crime was committed;
(c)[(b)] The relationship of the crime to the purposes of regulating the position
of public employment sought or the occupation for which the license is
sought;
(d)[(c)] The relationship of the crime to the ability, capacity, and fitness required
to perform the duties and discharge the responsibilities of the position of
employment or occupation;
(e) Evidence relevant to the circumstances of the crime, including any
Page 2 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 921
aggravating or mitigating circumstances or social conditions surrounding
the commission of the crime; and
(f) Any evidence of rehabilitation submitted by the applicant, including but not
limited to evidence related to the person's compliance with any conditions of
community supervision, parole, or mandatory supervision, the conduct and
work activity of the person, treatment undertaken by the person, and
testimonials or personal reference statements.
Section 3. KRS 335B.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Before a hiring or licensing authority denies a person a position of public
employment solely because of the person's prior conviction of a crime, the hiring
or licensing authority shall notify the person in writing of the following:
(a) The specific offense that is the basis of the intended denial;
(b) The reasons the offense was determined to directly relate to the duties and
responsibilities of the occupation and pose a reasonable threat to public
safety, health, or welfare, including findings for each of the factors in
subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act that the hiring or licensing authority
deemed relevant to the determination; and
(c) The right to submit additional evidence relevant to each of the factors listed
in subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act within thirty (30) days, which the
hiring or licensing authority shall consider before issuing a final
determination.
(2)[(1)] (a) If a hiring or licensing authority denies a person[an individual] a
position of public employment solely because of the person's[individual's]
prior conviction of a crime, the hiring or licensing authority shall notify the
person[individual] in writing of the following:
1. The grounds and reasons for the denial or disqualification, including the
specific offense that is the basis of the denial;
Page 3 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 921
2. The reasons the offense was determined to directly relate to the duties
and responsibilities of the occupation and posed a reasonable threat to
public safety, health, or welfare, including findings for each of the
factors in subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act that the hiring or
licensing authority deemed relevant to the determination;
3. That the person[individual] has the right to a hearing conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, if written request for hearing is
made within ten (10) days after service of notice;
4.[3.] The earliest date the person may reapply for a position of public
employment or a license; and
5.[4.] That evidence of rehabilitation may be considered upon reapplication.
(b) Any party aggrieved by a final order issued by a hiring or licensing authority
after a hearing under this subsection may appeal to Franklin Circuit Court in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(3)[(2)] (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a hiring or
licensing authority shall not disqualify a person[an individual] from pursuing,
practicing, or engaging in any occupation for which a license is required
solely because of the person's[individual's] prior conviction of a crime, unless
the authority provides the person[individual] with a written notice that the
authority has determined that the prior conviction may disqualify the person,
demonstrates the connection between the prior conviction and the license
being sought, and affords the person[individual] an opportunity to be
personally heard before the board prior to the board making a decision on
whether to disqualify the person[individual]. If the license is denied after the
person was heard, the hiring or licensing authority shall notify the
person[individual] in writing of the following:
1. The grounds and reasons for the denial or disqualification, including the
Page 4 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 921
specific offense that is the basis for the denial;
2. The reasons the offense was determined to directly relate to the duties
and responsibilities of the occupation and pose a reasonable threat to
public safety, health, or welfare, including findings for each of the
factors in subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act that the hiring or
licensing authority deemed relevant to the determination;
3. That the person[individual] has the right to a hearing conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, if a written request for hearing is
made within ten (10) days after service of notice;
4.[3.] The earliest date the person may reapply for a license; and
5.[4.] That evidence of rehabilitation may be considered upon reapplication.
(b) If a person's[an individual's] prior conviction was for a Class A felony, a
Class B felony, or any felony offense that would qualify the
person[individual] as a registrant pursuant to KRS 17.500, there shall be a
rebuttable presumption that a connection exists between the prior conviction
and the license being sought.
(c) Any party aggrieved by a final order issued by a hiring or licensing authority
after a hearing under this subsection may appeal to Franklin Circuit Court in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(4)[(3)] Except as provided in subsection (3)[(2)](b) of this section, in any
administrative hearing or civil litigation authorized under this section, the hiring or
licensing authority shall carry the burden of proof on the question of whether the
prior conviction directly relates to the position of employment sought or the
occupation for which the license is sought.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 335B.020 TO 335B.070 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person with a prior conviction of a crime may at any time, including before
Page 5 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 921
obtaining any required education or training for an occupation, make a request
to a hiring or licensing authority for a determination of whether his or her prior
conviction may disqualify him or her from obtaining the desired license or
certification in the occupation.
(2) The request in subsection (1) of this section shall be in writing and shall include:
(a) A copy of the person's criminal history record with explanation of each
conviction mentioned in the criminal history record; or
(b) A statement describing each criminal conviction including the date of each
conviction, the court of jurisdiction, and the sentence imposed.
(3) The request under subsection (1) of this section may include a statement
describing additional information for consideration by the hiring or licensing
authority, including but not limited to information relevant to any of the factors
for consideration described in subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act.
(4) Upon receipt of a written request in accordance with subsection (1) of this
section, the hiring or licensing authority shall:
(a) Evaluate the request and make a determination based upon the information
provided; and
(b) Provide notice of the determination to the requestor within sixty (60) days
from the date the request was received by the hiring or licensing authority
unless the hiring or licensing authority regulates fifty thousand (50,000) or
more members, in which case the hiring or licensing authority shall provide
notice of the initial determination to the requestor within ninety (90) days
from the date such request was received by the hiring or licensing authority.
(5) The notice of determination under subsection (4)(b) of this section shall be in
writing and mailed to the requestor at the address provided in his or her request,
and shall include the following:
(a) Whether the person is eligible for licensure or certification in the
Page 6 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 921
occupation at the current time based upon the information submitted by the
requestor;
(b) Whether there is a disqualifying offense that would disqualify the person
from engaging in the occupation at the current time and a statement
identifying such offense in the criminal history record or information
submitted for consideration;
(c) Any actions the person may take to remedy a disqualification, if any;
(d) The earliest date the person may submit another request for consideration,
if any; and
(e) A statement that the determination may be rescinded if, at the time before a
full application for a license or certificate is submitted, the applicant has
subsequently been convicted of a crime or has a previously undisclosed
conviction of a crime.
(6) A hiring or licensing authority may charge a fee not to exceed ninety-five dollars
($95) for each initial determination of eligibility it makes for the occupation
based upon the information provided by the requestor.
(7) A hiring or licensing authority may promulgate forms for requests for initial
determinations for the occupation in accordance with this section.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 335B.020 TO 335B.070 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A determination made in accordance with Section 4 of this Act that a person is not
disqualified for licensure or certification due to criminal history shall be binding upon
a hiring or licensing authority unless, at the time a full application for a license or
certificate is submitted, the applicant has subsequently been convicted of a crime or has
previously undisclosed convictions of a crime.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 335B.020 TO 335B.070 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 7 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 921
Each hiring or licensing authority shall include in its application for a license or
certificate and publish on its public website the following information:
(1) Whether an applicant's conviction of a crime may be used as a basis for denial;
(2) If conviction of a crime may be used as a basis for denial under Section 2 of this
Act, which offenses the hiring or licensing authority shall consider; and
(3) Notice of the right to request a determination in accordance with Section 4 of this
Act.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 335B.020 TO 335B.070 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Each hiring or licensing authority authorized to consider the criminal conviction of an
applicant shall provide a report on or before September 30 of each year to the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on
Economic Development and Workforce Investment and the Interim Joint Committee
on Licensing, Occupations, and Administrative Regulations detailing:
(1) The number of license applications received;
(2) The number of applications that resulted in a license being granted;
(3) The number of applications that resulted in a license being denied;
(4) The number of applications that were denied due to criminal history;
(5) A list of criminal offenses reported by persons who were granted a license;
(6) A list of criminal offenses reported by persons who were denied a license due to
criminal history, along with the time elapsed since the commission of the offense;
and
(7) The number of requests for a determination received by the licensing or
certification authority in accordance with Section 4 of this Act.
Section 8. KRS 309.362 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may deny or refuse to renew a license, may suspend or revoke a license,
may issue an administrative reprimand, or may impose probationary conditions or
Page 8 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 921
fines not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation when the licensee
has engaged in unprofessional conduct that has endangered or is likely to endanger
the health, welfare, or safety of the public. Unprofessional conduct shall include the
following:
(a) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license by fraud, misrepresentation,
concealment of material facts, or making a false statement to the board;
(b) Being convicted of a felony in any court if the act or acts for which the
licensee or applicant for license was convicted are determined by the board to
have a direct bearing on whether the person is trustworthy to serve the public
as a licensed massage therapist, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B.
"Conviction," as used in this paragraph, shall include a finding or verdict of
guilty, an admission of guilt, or a plea of nolo contendere in a court of law;
(c) Violating any lawful order or administrative regulation promulgated by the
board;
(d) Violating any provision of this chapter or administrative regulations
promulgated thereunder;
(e) Having sexual contact as defined by KRS 510.010(7) with a client or having
engaged or attempted to engage in lewd or immoral conduct with any client or
patient;
(f) Engaging in fraud or material deception in the delivery of professional
services, including reimbursement or advertising services, in a false or
misleading manner;
(g) Evidence of gross negligence or gross incompetence in the practice of
massage therapy;
(h) Violating the standards of practice or the code of ethics as promulgated by
administrative regulations;
(i) Violating KRS 304.39-215; or
Page 9 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 921
(j) Engaging in conduct that is subject to the penalties under KRS 304.99-060(4)
or (5).
(2) In making a decision about alleged lewd or immoral conduct under subsection
(1)(e) of this section, the board shall follow the provisions in Sections 2, 3, 4, and
5 of this Act.
(3)[(2)] The board may, at its discretion, deny, refuse to renew, suspend or revoke a
license, or impose probationary conditions following an administrative hearing
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B and in accordance with administrative regulations
promulgated by the board.
(4)[(3)] The surrender of a license shall not deprive the board of jurisdiction to
proceed with disciplinary actions under KRS 309.350 to 309.364.
Section 9. KRS 317A.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may refuse to issue or renew a license or permit, or may suspend or
revoke a license or permit, impose probationary conditions upon, impose an
administrative fine, issue a written reprimand or admonishment, or take any
combination of these actions regarding proof of any applicant's, permitee's, or
licensee's:
(a) Conviction of a felony, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B;
(b) Gross malpractice or incompetence;
(c) Mental or physical health that would endanger public health or safety;
(d) False or deceptive practice or misrepresentation including advertising;
(e) Practicing in an unlicensed salon or in a salon knowing that the salon is not in
compliance with this chapter or the administrative regulations of the board
promulgated pursuant to this chapter;
(f) Immoral conduct, unprofessional conduct, or a violation of the code of ethics;
(g) Teaching in an unlicensed school or in a school knowing that the school is not
in compliance with this chapter or the administrative regulations of the board
Page 10 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 921
promulgated pursuant to this chapter;
(h) Failure to comply with the administrative regulations of the board.
(2) In making a decision about alleged immoral conduct or unprofessional conduct
under subsection (1)(f) of this section, the board shall follow the provisions in
Sections 2, 3, 4, and 5 of this Act.
(3)[(2)] Payments in lieu of suspension collected by the board shall be deposited in the
State Treasury and credited to the general fund.
(4)[(3)] The board may require retesting of any licensee upon proper showing of gross
malpractice or incompetence on the part of the licensee.
Section 10. KRS 327.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board, after due notice and an opportunity for an administrative hearing
conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B may take any one (1) or a
combination of the following actions against any licensee, certificate holder, or
applicant:
(a) Refuse to license or certify any applicant;
(b) Refuse to renew the license or certificate of any person;
(c) Suspend or revoke or place on probation the license or certificate of any
person;
(d) Impose restrictions on the scope of practice of any person;
(e) Issue an administrative reprimand to any person;
(f) Issue a private admonishment to any person; and
(g) Impose fines for violations of this chapter not to exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars ($2,500).
(2) The following acts by a licensee, certificate holder, or applicant may be considered
cause for disciplinary action:
(a) Indulgence in excessive use of alcoholic beverages or abusive use of
controlled substances;
Page 11 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 921
(b) Engaging in, permitting, or attempting to engage in or permit the performance
of substandard patient care by himself, herself, or by persons working under
his or her supervision due to a deliberate or negligent act or failure to act,
regardless of whether actual injury to the patient is established;
(c) Having engaged in or attempted to engage in a course of lewd or immoral
conduct with any person:
1. While that person is a patient of a health care facility defined by KRS
216B.015 where the physical therapist or physical therapist's assistant
provides physical therapy services; or
2. While that person is a patient or client of the physical therapist or
physical therapist's assistant;
(d) Having sexual contact, as defined by KRS 510.010(7), without the consent of
both parties, with an employee or coworker of the licensee or certificate
holder;
(e) Sexually harassing an employee or coworker of the licensee or certificate
holder;
(f) Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor in the courts of this state or any other
state, territory, or country which affects his ability to continue to practice
competently and safely on the public, if in accordance with KRS Chapter
335B. "Conviction," as used in this paragraph, shall include a finding or
verdict of guilt, an admission of guilt, or a plea of nolo contendere;
(g) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license or certificate by fraud or material
misrepresentation or making any other false statement to the board;
(h) Engaging in fraud or material deception in the delivery of professional
services, including reimbursement, or advertising services in a false or
misleading manner;
(i) Evidence of gross negligence or gross incompetence in his practice of
Page 12 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 921
physical therapy;
(j) Documentation of being declared mentally disabled by a court of competent
jurisdiction and not thereafter having had his rights restored;
(k) Failing or refusing to obey any lawful order or administrative regulation of the
board;
(l) Promoting for personal gain an unnecessary device, treatment, procedure, or
service, or directing or requiring a patient to purchase a device, treatment,
procedure, or service from a facility or business in which he or she has a
financial interest;
(m) Being impaired by reason of a mental, physical, or other condition that
impedes his or her ability to practice competently;
(n) Violation of KRS 304.39-215; and
(o) Conduct that is subject to the penalties under KRS 304.99-060(4) or (5).
(3) In making a decision about lewd or immoral conduct under subsection (2)(c) of
this section, the board shall follow the provisions in Sections 2, 3, 4, and 5 of this
Act.
(4)[(3)] A private admonishment shall not be subject to disclosure to the public under
KRS 61.878(1)(l). A private admonishment shall not constitute disciplinary action
but may be used by the board for statistical purposes or in subsequent disciplinary
action against the same licensee, certificate holder, or applicant.
Section 11. KRS 309.318 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may refuse to issue a license or suspend, revoke, impose probationary
conditions upon, impose an administrative fine, issue a written reprimand, or any
combination thereof regarding any licensee upon proof that the licensee has:
(a) Been convicted of a crime as described in KRS 335B.010[(4)] that directly
relates to the occupation of interpreter, if in accordance with KRS Chapter
335B. A plea of "no contest" may be treated as a conviction for purposes of
Page 13 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 921
disciplinary action;
(b) Knowingly misrepresented or concealed a material fact in obtaining a license
or in reinstatement thereof;
(c) Committed any fraudulent act or practice;
(d) Been incompetent or negligent in the practice of interpreting;
(e) Violated any state statute or administrative regulation governing the practice
of interpreting;
(f) Violated the code of ethics of the national organization issuing the licensee's
certification as incorporated in administrative regulation; or
(g) Violated any federal or state law considered by the board to be applicable to
the practice of interpreting.
(2) When the board issues a written reprimand to the licensee, a copy of the reprimand
shall be placed in the permanent file of the licensee. The licensee shall have the
right to submit a response within thirty (30) days of its receipt and to have that
response filed in the permanent file.
(3) At any time during the investigative or hearing processes, the board may accept an
assurance of voluntary compliance from the licensee which effectively deals with
the complaint.
(4) The board may reconsider, modify, or reverse its probation, suspensions, or other
disciplinary action.
(5) Five (5) years from the date of a revocation, any person whose license has been
revoked may petition the board for reinstatement. The board shall investigate the
petition and may reinstate the license upon a finding that the individual has
complied with any terms prescribed by the board and is again able to competently
engage in the practice of interpreting.
(6) Any party aggrieved by a disciplinary action of the board may bring an action in
Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B.
Page 14 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 921
Section 12. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.
Page 15 of 15
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:45 PM Jacketed